Louisiana, session 2026, HB834.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:2467 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2467. Designation of animal shelters; optional acquisition of ownership of stray
animals
A.(1) Any local governmental subdivision in this state may designate any
animal shelter to provide sheltering services for lost, stray, and at-large domestic
animals found within its respective jurisdiction.
(2) A designated animal shelter may be owned or operated by a local
governmental subdivision, private entity, nonprofit organization, licensed
veterinarian, or any other entity reasonably competent to provide sheltering services.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 834 ENROLLED
(3) A designated shelter shall comply with applicable state and local laws
pertaining to animal shelters.
(4) A local governmental subdivision shall retain full discretion to:
(a) Select, contract with, or operate a shelter.
(b) Determine the scope of services provided.
(c) Enter into cooperative agreements with other local governmental
subdivisions.
(d) Adopt local standards or ordinances that meet or exceed the requirements
of this Section.
(e) Establish longer holding periods by local ordinance.
(f) Revoke the designation.
B.(1) A designated animal shelter may acquire sole ownership of a lost,
stray, unowned, or at-large animal only after compliance with all applicable state or
local laws, regulations, or ordinances regarding hold periods for that animal. If no
hold period is specified by any statute, parish, or municipality, the minimum stray
hold period shall be three days, excluding legal public holidays, to allow for owner
identification and recovery.
(2) During the initial hold period, the shelter shall do all of the following:
(a)(i) Makes a reasonably diligent effort to locate the owner and return the
animal to the owner. The shelter shall scan the animal for a microchip and check for
any other identifying information, including tattoos or collars with tags or any other
registration information at least twice, with the scans or checks conducted at least
twenty-four hours apart. The shelter shall maintain a record of the dates the scans
or checks were performed for at least one year.
(ii) If the shelter obtains information identifying the animal’s owner, the
shelter shall make a diligent effort to notify the owner and provide at least three
days, exclusive of legal public holidays, for the owner to respond, commencing from
the first attempt to notify. If the owner is located, the owner shall have seven days
from notification to reclaim the animal unless the owner relinquishes the animal to
the shelter or another person.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 834 ENROLLED
(b) Maintains continuous possession of the animal. Possession by the shelter
may be constructive, and shall include allowing persons to foster animals, provided
that any such foster shall return the animal to the shelter upon the shelter's request,
unless the hold period has expired and the shelter transfers ownership of the animal.
(c) Makes the animal, or a photograph with a written description of the
animal, available for public viewing and allows persons seeking lost animals to view
such animals and related records.
C.(1) If an animal remains unclaimed after the expiration of the applicable
hold period provided in this Section and after the shelter has made a diligent effort
to identify, notify, and return the animal to its owner, the local governmental
subdivision or designated shelter may acquire ownership of the animal and may
transfer ownership to another person, whether natural or juridical, consistent with
applicable law. The designated animal shelter may place an animal with or transfer
ownership to a rescue organization.
(2) If ownership is acquired pursuant to this Section and the shelter thereafter
transfers ownership to another person, natural or juridical, the shelter shall not
disclose the identity or contact information of the transferee to any person, including
any alleged prior owner, except pursuant to a lawfully issued subpoena or with the
written consent of the transferee.
D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to:
(1) Require a local governmental subdivision to designate an animal shelter.
(2) Alter or impair existing laws, regulations, or ordinances in place that
authorize a shelter to acquire immediate ownership of an animal by abandonment,
transfer, relinquishment, or any other lawful means.
(3) Create a statewide regulatory licensing scheme for animal shelters.
(4) Increase the financial burden of local governmental subdivisions.
E. No local governmental subdivision or designated animal shelter, or any
officer or employee thereof, shall be subject to civil damages arising from actions
taken in good faith in compliance with this Section, except for acts or omissions
constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 834 ENROLLED
F. This Section shall be construed to promote humane treatment of animals,
preserve local governmental flexibility, and avoid unnecessary regulatory burden.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.